Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1131.
do enact as follows:SB1131,11Section 1. 103.09 of the statutes is created to read:SB1131,2,82103.09 Reasonable break time for nursing employees. (1) Definition. 3In this section, “employer” means any person engaging in any activity, enterprise, 4or business employing at least one individual. “Employer” includes the state, its 5political subdivisions, and any office, department, independent agency, authority, 6institution, association, society, or other body in state or local government created 7or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, including the legislature 8and the courts.SB1131,2,119(2) Reasonable break time required. Subject to sub. (4), an employer shall 10provide all of the following for an employee who is breastfeeding the employee’s 11child under one year of age:SB1131,3,21(a) A reasonable break time to express breast milk for the child each time the 2employee has a need to express that milk.SB1131,3,43(b) A place, other than a bathroom, that is shielded from view and free from 4intrusion from coworkers and the public for the employee to express breast milk.SB1131,3,65(c) Access to an electrical outlet, running water, and a refrigerator for the 6storage of breast milk.SB1131,3,107(3) Unpaid break time; maintenance of health care coverage. (a) 8Subject to pars. (b) and (c), an employer that provides break time under sub. (2) (a) 9for an employee to express breast milk is not required to compensate the employee 10for any work time spent for that purpose.SB1131,3,1311(b) An employer shall consider break time under sub. (2) (a) paid work time if 12an employee is not completely relieved from duty during the entirety of such a 13break.SB1131,3,1814(c) If an employee’s eligibility for an employer contribution towards the 15employee’s health care coverage is dependent on the number of hours that the 16employee works, the employer shall treat any unpaid break time taken by the 17employee to express breast milk as paid work time for purposes of determining that 18eligibility.SB1131,4,219(4) Undue hardship exception. An employer that employs fewer than 50 20employees on a permanent basis in this state is not subject to the requirements 21under sub. (2) if the employer can demonstrate that compliance with those 22requirements would pose an undue hardship on the employer’s program, 23enterprise, or business by causing the employer significant difficulty or expense 1when considered in light of the size, financial resources, nature, or structure of the 2employer’s business.SB1131,4,63(5) Prohibited acts. (a) No person may interfere with, restrain, or deny the 4exercise of the right of an employee who is breastfeeding the employee’s child under 5one year of age to take reasonable break time to express that milk as provided 6under sub. (2).SB1131,4,137(b) No person may discharge or discriminate against an employee in 8promotion, in compensation, or in the terms, conditions, or privileges of 9employment for taking reasonable break time to express breast milk for the 10employee’s child under one year of age as provided in sub. (2), opposing a practice 11prohibited under this section, filing a complaint or attempting to enforce any right 12under this section, or testifying or assisting in any action or proceeding to enforce 13any right under this section.SB1131,5,214(6) Enforcement. An employee whose right to take reasonable break time to 15express breast milk for the employee’s child under one year of age as provided under 16sub. (2) is interfered with, restrained, or denied in violation of sub. (5) (a) or who is 17discharged or discriminated against in violation of sub. (5) (b) may file a complaint 18with the department, and the department shall process the complaint in the same 19manner that employment discrimination complaints are processed under s. 111.39. 20If the department finds that an employer has violated sub. (5) (a) or (b), the 21department may order the employer to take action to remedy the violation, 22including reinstating the employee, providing compensation in lieu of 23reinstatement, providing back pay accrued not more than 2 years before the 1complaint was filed, and paying reasonable actual costs and attorney fees to the 2complainant.SB1131,23Section 2. 106.54 (11) of the statutes is created to read:SB1131,5,64106.54 (11) The division shall receive complaints under s. 103.09 (6) and shall 5process the complaints in the same manner as employment discrimination 6complaints are processed under s. 111.39.SB1131,37Section 3. 111.322 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1131,5,118111.322 (2m) (a) The individual files a complaint or attempts to enforce any 9right under s. 103.02, 103.09, 103.10, 103.11, 103.13, 103.28, 103.32, 103.34, 10103.455, 104.12, 109.03, 109.07, 109.075, 146.997, or 995.55, or ss. 101.58 to 11101.599 or 103.64 to 103.82.SB1131,412Section 4. 111.322 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1131,5,1613111.322 (2m) (b) The individual testifies or assists in any action or proceeding 14held under or to enforce any right under s. 103.02, 103.09, 103.10, 103.11, 103.13, 15103.28, 103.32, 103.34, 103.455, 104.12, 109.03, 109.07, 109.075, 146.997, or 16995.55, or ss. 101.58 to 101.599 or 103.64 to 103.82.SB1131,517Section 5. 111.91 (2) (gp) of the statutes is created to read:SB1131,5,2018111.91 (2) (gp) The right of an employee who is breastfeeding the employee’s 19child under one year of age to take reasonable break time to express breast milk for 20the child as provided in s. 103.09 (2).SB1131,621Section 6. Initial applicability.SB1131,6,222(1) Reasonable break time for nursing employees. This act first applies 23to an employee who is covered by a collective bargaining agreement that contains 1provisions inconsistent with s. 103.09 on the day on which the collective bargaining 2agreement expires or is extended, modified, or renewed, whichever occurs first.SB1131,6,33